Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1126.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 303 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 303. Classes of Income.--* * *(a.13) The following apply: (1) A fitness facility shall be allowed a deduction from taxable income on its annual tax return for each free or discounted membership provided to a qualified individual. The 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 deduction for each free or discounted membership at a fitness facility to a qualified individual may not exceed the dollar amount paid as a membership at a fitness facility to any other individual. The deduction shall not result in taxable income being less than zero.(2) For the purposes of this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:(i) "Fitness facility" shall have the same meaning as "health club" in section 2 of the act of December 21, 1989 (P.L.672, No.87), known as the Health Club Act.(ii) "Qualified individual" means an individual who is on active and full-time duty in the United States Armed Forces, a member of the Pennsylvania National Guard or a member of a reserve component of the armed forces as defined in 51 Pa.C.S. § 7301 (relating to definitions).* * *Section 2. Section 401(3)1 of the act is amended by adding a phrase to read:Section 401. Definitions.--The following words, terms, and phrases, when used in this article, shall have the meaning ascribed to them in this section, except where the context clearly indicates a different meaning:* * *(3) "Taxable income." 1. * * *(v) (1) An additional deduction shall be allowed from the taxable income of a fitness facility for each free or discounted membership provided to a qualified individual. The deduction for each free or discounted membership at a fitness facility provided to a qualified individual may not exceed the dollar 20250HB1126PN1254 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 amount paid as a membership fee at a fitness facility to any other individual. This additional deduction from taxable income shall only be permitted to the extent deductions for these free or discounted memberships were not taken by the fitness facility for Federal income tax purposes for the taxable year.(2) For the purposes of this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:(i) "Fitness facility" shall have the same meaning as "health club" in section 2 of the act of December 21, 1989 (P.L.672, No.87), known as the Health Club Act.(ii) "Qualified individual" means an individual who is on active and full-time duty in the United States Armed Forces, a member of the Pennsylvania National Guard or a member of a reserve component of the armed forces as defined in 51 Pa.C.S. § 7301 (relating to definitions).* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVIII-IPERSONAL HEALTH INVESTMENT TAX CREDITSection 1801-I. Scope of article. This article relates to personal health investment tax credits.Section 1802-I. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth. "Fitness facility." As defined in section 2 of the act of December 21, 1989 (P.L.672, No.87), known as the Health Club 20250HB1126PN1254 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Act."Qualified individual." An individual who is on active and full-time duty in the United States Armed Forces, a member of the Pennsylvania National Guard or a member of a reserve component of the armed forces as defined in 51 Pa.C.S. § 7301 (relating to definitions)."Qualified sports and fitness expenses." Amounts paid for the sole purpose of participating in a physical activity, including membership at a fitness facility, participation or instruction in physical exercise or physical activity or equipment used in a program, including a self-directed program, of physical exercise or physical activity."Resident individual." As defined in section 301(p). "Tax credit." A personal health investment tax credit provided for under this article."Tax liability." The liability for taxes imposed under Article III, excluding any tax withheld by an employer under Article III."Taxpayer." A resident individual subject to the tax imposed under Article III.Section 1803-I. Tax credit. (a) Eligibility.--A taxpayer who is a qualified individual and incurs qualified sports and fitness expenses in a taxable year may claim a tax credit against the taxpayer's tax liability.(b) Amount of tax credit.--The amount of the tax credit may not exceed $600 per taxpayer per taxable year.(c) Claim of tax credit.--A taxpayer may claim a tax credit on a return filed under section 330.(d) Applicability of tax credit.--A tax credit shall be 20250HB1126PN1254 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applied against the taxpayer's tax liability.Section 1804-I. Prohibitions. The following apply:(1) A taxpayer may not carry over, carry back, obtain a refund of or sell, assign or transfer a tax credit.(2) A taxpayer may not claim a tax credit for the same qualified sports and fitness expenses used to claim a tax credit on a return filed by another taxpayer.Section 1805-I. Duties of department. The department shall publish guidelines and may promulgate regulations necessary for the implementation and administration of this article.Section 4. The addition of sections 303(a.13) and 401(3)1(v) and Article XVIII-I of the act shall apply to taxable years commencing after December 31, 2026.Section 5. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1126PN1254 - 5 - 12345678910111213141516